Missouri, session 2026, HB2821.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
2 known as section 191.265, to read as follows:
191.265. Any noncompete clause of an employment contract between an
2 employer and a physician licensed under chapter 334 that restricts the right of the
3 physician to practice medicine in any geographic area for any period of time after the
4 termination of such employment relationship shall be void and unenforceable, provided
5 that nothing in this section shall render void or unenforceable the remaining provisions
6 of any such employment contract.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.